Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2258.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6343. Trauma-informed screening for human trafficking victimization.(a) Screening development and administration.--The Department of Human Services, in collaboration with the Juvenile Court Judges' Commission, shall develop and implement a trauma-informed screening to identify whether a child is a victim of, or may be at risk for becoming a victim of, human trafficking involving sexual servitude as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions). A juvenile probation officer shall administer the screening to an allegedly delinquent child at the 123456789101112131415161718 intake conference following the submission of a written allegation.(b) Connection to specialized services.--If the screening under subsection (a) identifies a child as a victim of, or at risk for becoming a victim of, human trafficking involving sexual servitude, a juvenile probation officer shall connect the child with specialized programs and services available under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3062 (relating to specialized services for sexually exploited children).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2258PN2955 - 2 - 12345678910